Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.610

Drug control assistance unit—Duties.

The drug control assistance unit shall provide investigative assistance for the purpose of enforcement of the provisions of chapter 69.40 RCW.

[ 1983 c 3 s 107; 1980 c 69 s 1; 1970 ex.s. c 63 s 2.]